Mississippi, session 2026, HB150.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  There is created the Legislative Public Project Grant Program to be administered by the Community Services Division of the Mississippi Development Authority.  Each legislator is authorized to award a grant of Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) each year to be used for a public project in the legislator's district.  Grants from different legislators may be combined for projects. (2)  In order to receive and award a grant, a legislator shall submit an application to the Community Services Division of the Mississippi Development Authority.  The division shall establish criteria for the awarding of grants under this section.  The division shall review the application and may award the grant if the application complies with the criteria established by the division. (3)  When a grant is awarded, the funds shall be distributed to the county in which the project is located.  The board of supervisors shall distribute the funds for the project as directed by the division. (4)  This section shall stand repealed from and after July 1, 2029. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.